District of Columbia statutes.
16-4602.07

Inconvenient forum.

(a)

A court of the District which has jurisdiction under this chapter to make a child-custody determination may decline to exercise its jurisdiction at any time if it determines that it is an inconvenient forum under the circumstances and that a court of another state is a more appropriate forum. The issue of inconvenient forum may be raised upon motion of a party, the court’s own motion, or request of another court.

(b)

Before determining whether it is an inconvenient forum, a court of the District shall consider whether it is appropriate for a court of another state to exercise jurisdiction. For this purpose, the court shall allow the parties to submit information and shall consider all relevant factors, including:

(1)

Whether domestic violence has occurred and is likely to continue in the future and which state could best protect the parties and the child;

(2)

The length of time the child has resided outside the District;

(3)

The distance between the court in the District and the court in the state that would assume jurisdiction;

(4)

The relative financial circumstances of the parties;

(5)

Any agreement of the parties as to which state should assume jurisdiction;

(6)

The nature and location of the evidence required to resolve the pending litigation, including testimony of the child;

(7)

The ability of the court of each state to decide the issue expeditiously and the procedures necessary to present the evidence; and

(8)

The familiarity of the court of each state with the facts and issues in the pending litigation.

(c)

If a court of the District determines that it is an inconvenient forum and that a court of another state is a more appropriate forum, it shall stay the proceedings upon condition that a child-custody proceeding be promptly commenced in another designated state and may impose any other condition the court considers just and proper.

(d)

A court of the District may decline to exercise its jurisdiction under this chapter if a child-custody determination is incidental to an action for divorce or another proceeding while still retaining jurisdiction over the divorce or other proceeding.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-293, § 2(d), 48 DCR 2214
This section is referenced in § 16-4602.01, § 16-4602.03, § 16-4602.06, and § 16-4602.08.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 207 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (1997 Act).